Utah statutes.
77-16a-204.   UDC acceptance of transfer of guilty and mentally ill persons
-- Retransfer from UDC to department for admission to the Utah State Hospital.
(1)  The UDC medical administrator shall designate a transfer team of at least
three qualified staff members, including at least one licensed psychiatrist,
to evaluate the recommendation made by the department's review team pursuant
to Section 77-16a-203.  If the offender is mentally retarded, the transfer
team shall include at least one person who has expertise in testing and
diagnosis of mentally retarded individuals.
(2)  The transfer team shall concur in the recommendation if it determines
that UDC can provide the mentally ill offender with adequate mental health
treatment.
(3)  The UDC transfer team and medical administrator shall recommend the
facility in which the offender should be placed and the treatment to be
provided in order for his mental condition to remain stabilized to the
director of the Division of Institutional Operations, within the Department of
Corrections.
(4)  In the event that the department and UDC do not agree on the transfer of
a mentally ill offender, the administrator of the mental health facility where
the offender is located shall notify the mental health adviser for the board,
in writing, of the dispute.  The mental health adviser shall be provided with
copies of all reports and recommendations.  The board's mental health adviser
shall make a recommendation to the board on the transfer and the board shall
issue its decision within 30 days.
(5)  UDC shall notify the board whenever a mentally ill offender is
transferred from the department to UDC.
(6)  When a mentally ill offender sentenced under Section 77-16a-202, who has
been transferred from the department to UDC, and accepted by UDC, is evaluated
and it is determined that the offender's mental condition has deteriorated or
that the offender has become mentally unstable, the offender may be readmitted
to the Utah State Hospital in accordance with the findings and procedures
described in Section 62A-15-605.5.
(7)  Any person readmitted to the Utah State Hospital pursuant to Subsection
(6) shall remain in the custody of UDC, and the state hospital shall act
solely as the agent of UDC.
(8)  A mentally ill offender who has been readmitted to the Utah State
Hospital pursuant to Subsection (6) shall be transferred back to UDC in
accordance with the provisions of Section 77-16a-203.
